Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.008

Property of decedent exempt from legal process remains exempt—Additional designated property. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

(1) Any homestead or other property exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale under Title 6 RCW immediately before a decedent's death remains exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale for the debts of the decedent and the debts of the community composed of the decedent and the decedent's spouse or registered domestic partner that arose before the decedent's death, up to the amount specified in RCW 11.54.020(1), except as otherwise provided in Title 6 RCW or in this chapter.

(2) If the decedent resided or was domiciled in the state of Washington when the decedent died, and either:

(a) No homestead or other property was exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale under Title 6 RCW immediately before the decedent's death; or

(b) The total value of the property exempted from the claims of creditors under subsection (1) of this section or under the laws of another state (together with the value of any separate property of the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving registered domestic partner that is exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale for the debts of the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving registered domestic partner) is less than the amount specified in RCW 11.54.020(1)(b);

then the court shall designate other property of the estate, either community or separate, that, when added to the value of: (i) The property exempted under subsection (1) of this section; (ii) the property exempted from attachment, execution, and forced sale under the laws of another state; and (iii) the separate property of the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving registered domestic partner that is exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale for the debts of the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving registered domestic partner, has an aggregate value that does not exceed the amount specified in RCW 11.54.020(1)(b). This additional designated property, together with any additional award that a court may grant for family support under RCW 11.54.040, shall also be exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale for the debts of the decedent and the debts of the community composed of the decedent and the decedent's spouse or registered domestic partner that arose before the decedent's death, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 2024 c 20 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.